North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 32. Health Information.

§ 116-260.
Information on meningococcal disease immunization.

Each public or private educational institution that offers a postsecondary degree as defined in

G.S. 116-15

and that has a residential campus shall provide vaccination information on meningococcal disease to each student. The vaccination information shall be contained on student health forms provided to each student by the educational institution and shall include space for the student to indicate whether or not the student has received the vaccination against meningococcal disease. The vaccination information about meningococcal disease shall include any recommendations issued by the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention regarding the disease.

The vaccination information obtained under this section that is in the possession of the educational institution is confidential and shall not be a public record under

G.S. 132-1

.

This section shall not be construed to require the educational institution to provide the meningococcal vaccination to students.

This section shall not apply if the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention no longer recommends the meningococcal vaccine.

This section does not create a private right of action.

History.

2003-194, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 73.

§§ 116-261 through 116-270.

Reserved for future codification purposes.